Utah statutes.
38-11-106.   State not liable.

The state and the state's agencies, instrumentalities, and political subdivisions are not liable for:

(1)  issuance or denial of any certificate of compliance;

(2)  any claims made against the fund; or

(3)  failure of the fund to pay any amounts ordered by the director to be paid from the fund.



Amended by Chapter 42, 2004 General Session

